Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2802, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2802. As used in Section 2801 et seq. of this title:


1. “Accepted standards for mass appraisal practice” means those


standards for the collection and analysis of information about


taxable properties within a taxing jurisdiction permitting the


accurate estimate of fair cash value for similar properties in the


jurisdiction either without direct observation of such similar


properties or without direct sales price information for such


similar properties using a reliable statistical or other method to


estimate the values of such properties;

Req. No. 2476 Page 1


2. “Additional homestead exemption” means the exemption


provided by Section 2890 of this title;


3. “Assessor” means the county assessor and, unless the context


clearly requires otherwise, deputy assessors and persons employed by


the county assessor in performance of duties imposed by law;


4. “Assess and value” means to establish the fair cash value


and taxable fair cash value of taxable real and personal property


pursuant to requirements of law;


5. “Assessed valuation” or “assessed value” means the


percentage of the fair cash value of personal property, or the


percentage of the taxable fair cash value of real property, pursuant


to the provisions of Sections 8 and 8B of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution, either of individual items of personal property,


parcels of real property or the aggregate total of such individual


taxable items or parcels within a jurisdiction;


6. “Assessment percentage” means the percentage applied to


personal property and real property pursuant to Section 8 of Article


X of the Oklahoma Constitution;


7. “Assessment ratio” means the relationship between assessed


value and taxable fair cash value for a county or for use categories


within a county expressed as a percentage determined in the annual


equalization ratio study;





Req. No. 2476 Page 2


8. “Assessment roll” means a computerized or noncomputerized


record required by law to be kept by the county assessor and


containing information about property within a taxing jurisdiction;


9. “Assessment year” means the year beginning January 1 of each


calendar year and ending on December 31 preceding the following


January 1 assessment date;


10. “Circuit breaker” means the form of property tax relief


provided by Sections 2904 through 2911 of this title;


11. “Class of subjects” means a category of property


specifically designated pursuant to provisions of the Oklahoma


Constitution for purposes of ad valorem taxation;


12. “Code” means the Ad Valorem Tax Code, Section 2801 et seq.


of this title;


13. “Coefficient of dispersion” means a statistical measure of


assessment uniformity for a category of property or for all property


within a taxing jurisdiction;


14. “Confidence level” means a statistical procedure for


determining the degree of reliability for use in reporting the


assessment ratio for a taxing jurisdiction;


15. “Cost approach” means a method used to establish the fair


cash value of property involving an estimate of current construction


cost of improvements, subtracting accrued depreciation including any


loss in value that may be caused by physical deterioration,



Req. No. 2476 Page 3


functional obsolescence or economic obsolescence and adding the


value of the land.


a. Physical deterioration is a cause of depreciation that


is a loss in value due to ordinary wear and tear and


the forces of nature.


b. Functional or internal obsolescence is the loss in


value of a property resulting from changes in tastes,


preferences, technical innovations or market


standards.


c. Economic or external obsolescence is a cause of


depreciation that is a loss in value as a result of


impairment in utility and desirability caused by


factors outside the boundaries of the property or loss


of value in a property (relative, relative to the cost


of replacing it with a property of equal utility),


utility that stems from factors external to the


property;


16. “County board of equalization” means the board which, upon


hearing competent evidence, has the authority to correct and adjust


the assessment rolls in its respective county to conform to fair


cash value and such other responsibilities as prescribed in Section


2801 et seq. of this title;


17. “Equalization” means the process for making adjustments to


taxable property values within a county by analyzing the

Req. No. 2476 Page 4


relationships between assessed values and fair cash values in one or


more use categories within the county or between counties by


analyzing the relationship between assessed value and fair cash


value in each county;


18. “Equalization ratio study” means the analysis of the


relationships between assessed values and fair cash values in the


manner provided by law;


19. “Fair cash value” or “market value” means the value or


price at which a willing buyer would purchase property and a willing


seller would sell property if both parties are knowledgeable about


the property and its uses and if neither party is under any undue


pressure to buy or sell and for real property shall mean the value


for the highest and best use for which such property was actually


used, or was previously classified for use, during the calendar year


next preceding the applicable January 1 assessment date;


20. “Homestead exemption” means the reduction in the taxable


value of a homestead as authorized by law;


21. “Income and expense approach” means a method to estimate


fair cash value of a property by determining the present value of


the projected income stream;


22. “List and assess” means the process by which taxable


property is discovered, its description recorded for purposes of ad


valorem taxation and its fair cash value and taxable fair cash value


are established;

Req. No. 2476 Page 5


23. “Mill” or “millage” means the rate of tax imposed upon


taxable value. One (1) mill equals One Dollar ($1.00) of tax for


each One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of taxable value;


24. “Multiple regression analysis” means a statistical


technique for estimating unknown data on the basis of known and


available data;


25. “Parcel” means a contiguous area of land described in a


single description by a deed or other instrument or as one of a


number of lots on a plat or plan, separately owned and capable of


being separately conveyed;


26. “Sales comparison approach” means the collection,


verification, and screening of sales data, stratification of sales


information for purposes of comparison and use of such information


to establish the fair cash value of taxable property;


27. “State Board of Equalization” means the Board responsible


for valuation of railroad, airline and public service corporation


property and the adjustment and equalization of all property values


both centrally and locally assessed;


28. “Taxable value” means the percentage of the fair cash value


of personal property or the taxable fair cash value of real


property, less applicable exemptions, upon which an ad valorem tax


rate is levied pursuant to the provisions of Section 8 and Section


8B of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution;



Req. No. 2476 Page 6


29. “Taxable fair cash value” means the fair cash value of


locally assessed real property as capped pursuant to Section 8B of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution;


30. “Use category” means a subcategory of real property, that


is either agricultural use, residential use or commercial/industrial


use but does not and shall not constitute a class of subjects within


the meaning of the Oklahoma Constitution for purposes of ad valorem


taxation;


31. “Use value” means the basis for establishing fair cash


value of real property pursuant to the requirement of Section 8 of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution; and


32. “Visual inspection program” means the program required in


order to gather data about real property from physical examination


of the property and improvements in order to establish the fair cash


values of properties so inspected at least once each four (4) five


(5) years and the fair cash values of similar properties on an


annual basis.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2820, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2820. A. Each county assessor shall conduct a


comprehensive program for the individual visual inspection of all


taxable property within his or her respective county. Each assessor


shall thereafter maintain an active and systematic program of visual


inspection on a continuous basis and shall establish an inspection

Req. No. 2476 Page 7


schedule which will result in the individual visual inspection of


all taxable property within the county at least once each four (4)


five (5) years.


B. The first cycle of visual inspections for property shall


begin upon January 1, 1991 January 1, 2027, as prescribed by Section


2481.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and shall end upon


December 31, 1994 December 31, 2031. Thereafter, each succeeding


four-year five-year cycle for visual inspections shall begin upon


January 1 of the year following the fourth fifth year of the


preceding cycle and shall end upon December 31 of the applicable


four-year five-year cycle. The county assessor shall utilize the


standard parcel identification system required by law to assign each


parcel of real property a unique identification code or number. The


code or number shall be used to ensure that the inspection sequence


for real property results in a visual inspection of each parcel at


least once each four (4) five (5) years. Each successor of the


county assessor shall use the same cycle as used by the assessor’s


predecessor in office for visual inspections of property.


C. Prior to the beginning of the first visual inspection cycle


and each subsequent visual inspection cycle, the county assessor


shall develop a plan that details the number of real property


parcels to be inspected in each year of the cycle by use category,


geographic area or other basis, the resources and budget proposed to


complete the inspections and the valuation methodology to be used in

Req. No. 2476 Page 8


determining the fair cash value of the real property and


improvements thereon. The plan shall be adequate to ensure the


visual inspection of all parcels of real property within the county


at least once each four (4) five (5) years. The plan shall also be


adequate to ensure that the information collected from the visual


inspection of real property each year is sufficient to establish a


representative sample from each use category in order to conduct the


proper valuation of all taxable property within each use category by


means of an accepted standard for mass appraisal practice. The


county assessor shall submit the proposed plan to the Oklahoma Tax


Commission by the first working day in October preceding the


beginning of the four-year five-year cycle. The Oklahoma Tax


Commission shall either approve the plan if the plan and resources


are adequate to complete the cycle and if the plan will result in a


representative sample from each use category in order to value all


taxable property each year or shall correct and modify the plan in


order to establish a program for visual inspection that will be


completed by the end of the cycle and that will provide a


representative sample from each use category in order to value all


taxable property each year. An approved plan shall be made for each


county as of the beginning date of each cycle and a copy of such


plan shall be filed with the Oklahoma Tax Commission.


D. Each year the county assessor shall submit a progress report


to the Oklahoma Tax Commission indicating the number of real

Req. No. 2476 Page 9


property parcels inspected by use category, geographic area or other


basis, the resources and budget expended in the last completed


fiscal year and the valuation methodology used to determine fair


cash values of the real property and improvements. The Oklahoma Tax


Commission shall correct and modify any visual inspection plan


during the four-year five-year cycle if progress reports indicate


that inspection of real property parcels will not be completed or


will be performed in violation of legal requirements for such


inspections. The county assessor shall be required to complete the


four-year five-year cycle in accordance with such plan as corrected


and modified.


E. Each county assessor shall prepare and submit to the


Oklahoma Tax Commission a detailed report of the progress made in


the visual inspection program in his or her county to the date of


the report and it shall be made a matter of public record. Such


report shall be submitted upon forms supplied by the Oklahoma Tax


Commission and shall consist of such information as the Oklahoma Tax


Commission requires. The progress report shall be submitted not


later than October 15 each year or the first working day thereafter.


Based in part on all such county progress reports, the Oklahoma Tax


Commission shall prepare its own report from all sources and


transmit a copy of its own report to the Legislature and the State


Board of Equalization.



Req. No. 2476 Page 10


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2821, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2821. A. Each county assessor shall cause real


property to be physically inspected as part of the visual inspection


cycle and shall require such examination as will provide adequate


data from which to make accurate valuations.


B. The information gathered from the physical inspection shall


be relevant to the type of property involved, its use category, the


valuation methodology to be used for the property, whether the


methodology consists of the cost approach, an income and expense


approach or sales comparison approach, and shall be complete enough


in order to establish the fair cash value of the property in


accordance with accepted standards for mass appraisal practice.


C. Information gathered during the physical inspection shall be


recorded using a standard method as prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax


Commission in computerized or noncomputerized form. The information


may include property ownership, location, size, use, use category, a


physical description of the land and improvements or such other


information as may be required.


D. In order to conduct the visual inspections of real property


during the four-year five-year cycle, each county assessor shall


acquire and maintain cadastral maps and a parcel identification


system. The standards for the cadastral maps and the parcel


identification system shall be uniform for each county of the state

Req. No. 2476 Page 11


and shall be in such form as developed by the Ad Valorem Task Force


Division of the Oklahoma Tax Commission.


E. The county assessor shall maintain a comprehensive sales


file for each parcel of real property within the county containing


relevant property characteristics, sales price information,


adjustments to sales price for purposes of cash equivalency,


transaction terms and such other information as may be required in


order to establish the fair cash value of taxable real property.


Each county assessor shall ensure that the office is equipped with


adequate drafting facilities, tools, equipment and supplies in order


to produce or update maps, sketches or drawings necessary to support


the proper administration of the ad valorem tax and such other tools


or equipment as may be required to perform duties imposed by law for


the discovery and valuation of taxable property.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2822, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2822. A. Each county assessor in budgets submitted to


the county excise board or county budget board shall make adequate


provision to effect countywide visual inspections of real property


during the four-year five-year cycle.


B. Each jurisdiction within a county which receives revenue


from an ad valorem mill rate shall receive a copy of the budget for


the countywide visual inspection program for that county. The


county excise board or county budget board shall notify all such

Req. No. 2476 Page 12


jurisdictions of any meetings at which discussion or action on the


budget for the comprehensive program of visual inspections is or may


be on the agenda. Such jurisdictions shall have the opportunity to


appear before the county excise board or the county budget board,


prior to approval of such budgets, to provide testimony, comments,


information, and documentation concerning the budgets submitted by


the county assessor pursuant to subsection A of this section.


C. The several county excise and budget boards, in passing upon


budgets submitted by the several assessors, shall authorize and levy


amounts which will suffice to carry out the countywide visual


inspection program as approved by the Oklahoma Tax Commission under


Section 2820 of this title. Such amounts shall be separate from


other funds allocated to the office of county assessor and shall be


used exclusively to carry out the countywide visual inspection


program. The allocation of such amounts shall not serve to decrease


other funds allocated to the office of county assessor by the county


excise board or the county budget board. Any disputes as to the


amount authorized to carry out the countywide visual inspection


program shall be resolved by the county excise board; provided, the


Oklahoma Tax Commission shall take such action as may be necessary


to ensure that such amounts are used exclusively to carry out the


countywide visual inspection program and that the allocation of such


amounts does not serve to decrease other funds allocated to the


office of county assessor.

Req. No. 2476 Page 13


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2829, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2829. A. Each county assessor, in order to comply with


the provisions of Section 17 2817 of this act title requiring the


annual valuation of all taxable real and personal property within


the county, shall establish the fair cash value of such taxable


property using an accepted mass appraisal methodology.


B. For purposes of this section “accepted mass appraisal


methodology” shall mean the process for making estimates of fair


cash value for a property about which no direct or timely


information is available concerning economic value by using known


information about the property characteristics, location, use, size,


sales price and other information of similar properties. Such mass


appraisal methodology may include multiple regression analysis or


other statistical techniques for mass appraisal. If information of


similar properties is not available in the taxing jurisdiction, the


county assessor may use other applicable regional or national


information to annually determine the fair cash value of a property


estimated at the price it would bring at a fair voluntary sale as


provided in Section 17 2817 of this act title.


C. Each county assessor shall utilize the information gathered


from the visual inspection of real property conducted during each


year of the four-year five-year cycle for such inspections and shall


conduct such statistical calculations using the data so acquired

Req. No. 2476 Page 14


together with sales price or other information available as may be


required to make accurate estimates of fair cash values for all


taxable real or personal property within the county each year. The


results of such calculations shall be recorded on the assessment


roll of the county on an annual basis in order to reflect any


increase or decrease in the fair cash value of any property in any


year.


D. The statistical analysis required by this section shall be


performed within each county using such computer facilities as may


be available, but shall be conducted in accordance with procedures


established for the uniform mass appraisal program established by


the Oklahoma Tax Commission.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-2476 QD 1/15/2026 12:35:39 AM



















Req. No. 2476 Page 15